Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-224
Department of Transportation; retention of signs, displays, or devices; request.

Upon receipt of a petition under section 39-223, the Nebraska Department of Transportation shall make request of the United States Department of Transportation for permission to retain the directional signs, displays, or devices which provide information for the specific economic area responsible for the petition.

Laws 1978, LB 534, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 39-1320.13;

Laws 1995, LB 264, § 18;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 105.